Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2123YC (2) 91 ll/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 578A.3, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. An occupant shall not use a leased space for residential 3 purposes. An occupant who uses a leased space for residential 4 purposes is immediately in default and the operator may limit 5 the occupantâs access to the leased space to the hours which 6 the office is open at the self-service storage facility and 7 proceed in accordance with this chapter. 8 Sec. 2. Section 578A.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 578A.6 Right Rental agreement ââ right to deny access due to 11 default. 12 1. A rental agreement may be a written or oral agreement. 13 If a written rental agreement is presented to a potential 14 occupant by an operator and if the potential occupant takes 15 possession of a leased space, a failure by the occupant 16 to execute and deliver the written rental agreement to the 17 operator within thirty days from the initial date of occupancy 18 constitutes acceptance of the terms of the written rental 19 agreement. 20 2. If the occupant is in default or if the operator does 21 not renew the occupantâs rental agreement , the operator shall 22 have deliver to the occupant a written notice or an electronic 23 mail notice, if consented to by the parties in accordance with 24 section 578A.5, subsection 5, to remove personal property from 25 the leased space within fifteen days. During the fifteen-day 26 period, the operator has the right to place reasonable 27 restrictions on the occupantâs use of the leased space, 28 including the right to deny or limit the occupant occupantâs 29 access to the leased space to the hours which the office is 30 open at the self-service storage facility if such right is set 31 forth in the rental agreement. 32 3. Any personal property remaining is subject to lien 33 as provided in section 578A.5 and in accordance with section 34 578A.7. 35 -1- LSB 2123YC (2) 91 ll/jh 1/ 2 H.F. _____